Utah statutes.
31A-2-305.   Immunity from prosecution.

(1)  If a natural person declines to appear, testify, or produce any record or document in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner, the commissioner may apply to a judge of the district court where the proceeding is held for an order to the person to attend, testify, or produce records or documents as requested by the commissioner.  In the event a witness asserts a privilege against self-incrimination, testimony and evidence from the witness may be compelled pursuant to Title 77, Chapter 22b, Grants of Immunity.

(2)  If a person claims the privilege against self-incrimination and refuses to appear, testify, or produce documents in response to probative evidence against him in a proceeding to revoke or suspend his license, and if the testimony or documents would have been admissible as evidence in a court of law except for the Fifth Amendment privilege, the refusal to appear, testify, or produce documents is, for noncriminal proceedings only, rebuttable evidence of the facts on which the proceeding is based.

